California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 include whether a licensee is an associate licensee within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 2079.13 of the Civil Code and, if the associate licensee is a broker, identify each responsible broker with whom the licensee is contractually associated as described in Section 10032 of this code or Section 2079.13 of the Civil Code.

(b) For purposes of this section, “internet” has the meaning set forth in paragraph (6) of subdivision (f) of Section 17538.

(c) Upon petition by a licensee accompanied by a fee sufficient to defray costs associated with consideration of a petition, the commissioner may remove from the posting of discipline described in subdivision (a) an item that has been posted on the department’s internet website for no less than 10 years and for which the licensee provides evidence of rehabilitation indicating that the notice is no longer required in order to
 prevent a credible risk to members of the public utilizing licensed activity of the licensee. In evaluating a petition, the commissioner shall take into consideration other violations that present a credible risk to the members of the public since the posting of discipline requested for removal.

(d) The department may develop, through regulations, the amount of the fee and the minimum information to be included in a licensee’s petition, including, but not limited to, a written justification and evidence of rehabilitation pursuant to Section 482.

(e) “Posted” for purposes of this section is defined as the date of disciplinary action taken by the department.

(f) The department shall maintain a list of all licensees whose disciplinary records are altered as a result of a petition approved under subdivision (c). The
 department shall make the list accessible to other licensing bodies. The department shall update and provide the list to other licensing bodies as often as it modifies the records displayed on its internet website in response to petitions approved under subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 6.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10084.

The commissioner may prepare a pamphlet or brochure dealing with disclosures of information in residential real estate transactions. The costs of preparation and distribution may be paid from such moneys as may from time to time be appropriated from the Real Estate Fund for education and research. The commissioner shall make copies of the pamphlet or brochure available upon request to sellers, buyers, and real estate licensees for a fee commensurate with the cost of preparation and distribution. Such fees as are collected shall be paid into the education and research account of the Real Estate Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 826.)
-------------------------------------------

10084.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10450.6, on or before January 1, 1991, the department, using funds appropriated from the Education and Research Account in the Real Estate Fund, shall develop a booklet to educate and inform consumers on all of the following:

(1) Common environmental hazards that are located on, and affect, real property. The types of common environmental hazards shall include, but not be limited to, asbestos, radon gas, lead-based paint, formaldehyde, fuel and chemical storage tanks,
 and water and soil contamination.

(2) The significance of common environmental hazards and what can be done to mitigate these hazards.

(3) What sources can provide more information on common environmental hazards for the consumer.

(b) The department shall seek the advice of the State Department of Health Services to assist it in determining the contents of the booklet prepared pursuant to this section, and shall seek the assistance of the State Department of Health Services in the writing of the booklet.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 969, Sec. 1.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10084.2.

(a) As existing resources permit, or as private resources are made available, the Homeowners’ Guide to Environmental Hazards prepared pursuant to Section 10084.1, updated pursuant to Sections 13261, 25417, and 25417.1 of the Health and Safety Code, and as required to be updated pursuant to Section 25417.2 of the Health and Safety Code, shall be updated to include three new sections on wildfires, climate change, and sea level rise.

(b) The Department of Toxic Substances Control shall seek the advice and assistance of departments within the Natural Resources Agency in the writing of the booklet to determine the contents of the booklet prepared pursuant to this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 263, Sec. 2.   (AB 455)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10085.

The commissioner may require that any or all materials used in obtaining advance fee agreements, including but not limited to the contract forms, letters or cards used to solicit prospective sellers, and radio and television advertising be submitted to him or her at least 10 calendar days before they are used. Should the commissioner determine that any such matter, when used alone or with any other matter, would tend to mislead
 he or she may, within 10 calendar days of the date he or she receives same, order that it not be used, disseminated, nor published. Any person or entity using, disseminating, or publishing any matter which the commissioner has ordered, pursuant to this section, not to be used, published, or disseminated shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or both, for each such use, dissemination, or publication.

The commissioner may determine the form of the advance fee agreements, and all material used in soliciting prospective owners and sellers shall be used in the form and manner which he or she determines is necessary to carry out the purposes and intent of this part.

Any violation of any of the provisions of this part or of the rules, regulations, orders or requirements of the commissioner
 thereunder shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action against a licensee, or for proceedings under Section 10081 of this code, or both. These sanctions are in addition to the criminal proceedings hereinbefore provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 630, Sec. 4.   (SB 94)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10085.5.

(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to claim, demand, charge, receive, collect, or contract for an advance fee (1) for soliciting lenders on behalf of borrowers or performing services for borrowers in connection with loans to be secured directly or collaterally by a lien on real property, before the borrower becomes obligated to complete the loan or, (2) for performing any other activities for which a license is required, unless the person is a licensed real estate broker and has complied with the provisions of this part.

(b) This section does not prohibit the acceptance or receipt of an advance fee by any bank, savings association, credit union, industrial loan company, or person acting within the scope of a license issued to that person pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) of the Financial Code, in connection with loans to be secured directly or collaterally by a lien on real property. This section does not apply to charges made by title insurers and controlled escrow companies pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12340) of Part 6 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code.

(c) A violation of this section is a public offense punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment, or if by a corporation, the violation is punishable by a fine not exceeding
 fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 485, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10085.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it shall be unlawful for any licensee who negotiates, attempts to negotiate, arranges, attempts to arrange, or otherwise offers to perform a mortgage loan modification or other form of mortgage loan forbearance for a fee or other compensation paid by the borrower, to do any of the following:

(1) Claim, demand, charge, collect, or receive any compensation until after the licensee has fully performed each and every service the licensee contracted to perform or represented that he, she, or it would perform.

(2) Take any wage assignment, any lien of any type on real or personal property, or other security to secure the payment of compensation.

(3) Take any power of attorney from the borrower for any purpose.

(b) A violation of this section by a natural person who is a licensee is a public offense punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment, or if by a corporation, the violation is punishable by a fine not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). These penalties
 are cumulative to any other remedies or penalties provided by law.

(c) This section shall apply only to mortgages and deeds of trust secured by residential real property containing four or fewer dwelling units.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 569, Sec. 1.   (AB 1950)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10086.

(a) If the commissioner determines through an investigation that (1) a person has engaged or is engaging in an activity which is a violation of a provision of this part, other than a provision of Article 8 (commencing with Section 10249) of Chapter 3, or which is a violation of a regulation of the commissioner adopted for the purpose of implementing any provision of this part, other than a regulation adopted pursuant to a provision of Article 8 (commencing with Section 10249) of Chapter 3, or (2) a real estate broker has engaged in or is
 engaging in an activity which is a violation of a provision of Division 6 (commencing with Section 17000) of the Financial Code, and which is not exempt pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 17006, the commissioner may direct the person to desist and refrain from such activity by issuance of an order specifying the nature of the activity and the factual and legal basis for his or her determination. The respondent to whom the order is directed shall immediately, upon receipt of the order, cease the activity described in the order.

(b) The respondent may, within 30 days after service of the order to desist and refrain, file a request for a hearing. If, with the request for hearing, the respondent also files a written verification that the order of the commissioner precludes him or her from further engaging in a substantial proportion of his or her business, the commissioner shall, within 10 days thereafter, file an action in
 superior court to restrain the respondent from continuing the activity or doing any act in furtherance thereof pending the completion of a hearing pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

If the commissioner fails to bring the action in superior court within the time prescribed by this section, or if the court refuses to restrain the respondent pending the decision of the commissioner following the administrative hearing, the respondent may resume the activities in question pending the rendering of the decision of the commissioner following the administrative hearing.

(c) The administrative hearing shall be commenced by the commissioner within 30 days after receipt of respondent’s request unless the respondent agrees to a postponement. If the hearing is not commenced within 30 days after receipt of respondent’s request or on the
 date to which continued with respondent’s consent, or if the commissioner does not render a decision within 15 days after receipt of the proposed decision following the hearing, the order shall be deemed rescinded.

(d) The provisions of Section 11019, and not the provisions of this section, shall apply in the case of an activity which the commissioner determines to be in violation of Article 8 (commencing with Section 10249) of Chapter 3 or of a regulation of the commissioner for implementation of any provision of that article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 861, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10087.

(a) In addition to acting pursuant to the authority provided under Sections 10086, 10176, and 10177, the commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for a hearing, by order, suspend, bar from any position of employment, management, or control, or bar from participation in an examination for licensure, for a period not exceeding 36 months, a real estate salesperson or real estate broker, or an
 unlicensed person issued an order under Section 10086, if the commissioner finds either of the following:

(1) That the suspension or bar is in the public interest and that the person has committed or caused a violation of this division or rule or order of the commissioner, which violation was either known or should have been known by the person committing or causing it or has caused material damage to the public.

(2) That the person has been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to any crime, or has been held liable in any civil action by final judgment, or any administrative judgment by any public agency, if that crime or civil or administrative judgment involved any offense involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit, or any other offense reasonably related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in the real estate business in accordance with the provisions
 of this division.

(b) Within 15 days from the date of a notice of intention to issue an order pursuant to subdivision (a), the person may request a hearing under the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). If no hearing is requested within 15 days after the mailing or service of that notice and none is ordered by the commissioner, the failure to request a hearing shall constitute a waiver of the right to a hearing.

(c) Upon receipt of a notice of intention to issue an order pursuant to this section, the person who is the subject of the proposed order is immediately prohibited from engaging in any business activity involving real estate that is subject to regulation under this division.

(d) Persons suspended or barred under this
 section are prohibited from participating in any business activity of a real estate salesperson or a real estate broker and from engaging in any real estate-related business activity on the premises where a real estate salesperson or real estate broker is conducting business. Persons suspended or barred under this section are also prohibited from participating in any real estate-related business activity of a finance lender, residential mortgage lender, bank, credit union, escrow company, title company, or underwritten title company. Persons suspended or barred from a position of employment, management, or control under this section are also barred from participating in examinations for licensure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.   (SB 875)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10088.

After the filing of a desist and refrain order or a bar order, or the commencement of a formal disciplinary action by the commissioner, and upon a finding by the commissioner that action is warranted for the protection of the public, and that failure to act is likely to result in grievous harm to the public, the commissioner may make information public confirming the fact of an investigation or proceeding regarding a licensee or unlicensed person believed to be engaging in activities for
 which a real estate license is required. Any release that contains the identity of a person or business under investigation shall include language explaining that the subject of the release is entitled to a public hearing on the merits of the desist and refrain order, bar order, or accusation or accusations against that person or business. The release may also clarify the procedural aspects and current status of the investigation or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 717, Sec. 3.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Hearings [10100. - 10106.]

10100.

(a) Before suspending or revoking a license or license endorsement issued under the provisions of this part, the department shall proceed as prescribed by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the department shall have all the powers granted therein.

(b) Upon denial of an application for a license or license endorsement issuable under the provisions of this part, the department shall proceed under Sections 485 to 488, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 380, Sec. 2.   (SB 875)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10100.2.

A licensee against whom an investigation is pending or an accusation has been filed pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code may petition the commissioner to voluntarily surrender his or her license. The surrender of a license shall become effective upon acceptance by the commissioner and thereafter, a surrendered licensee may be relicensed only by petitioning for reinstatement pursuant to Section 11522 of the Government Code. When deciding a petition for reinstatement, the commissioner may consider all relevant evidence, including affidavits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 587, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10100.4.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 11415.60 of the Government Code, the department may enter into a settlement with a licensee or applicant instead of the issuance of an accusation or statement of issues against that licensee or applicant.

(b) The settlement shall identify the factual basis for the action being taken and the statutes or regulations violated.

(c) A person who enters a settlement pursuant to this section is not precluded from filing a petition, in the timeframe permitted by law, to modify the terms of the settlement or a petition for early termination of probation, if probation is part of the settlement.

(d) Any settlement with a licensee executed pursuant to this section shall be considered discipline by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 5.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10101.

The accusation provided for by Section 11503 of the Government Code shall be filed not later than three years from the occurrence of the alleged grounds for disciplinary action unless the acts or omissions with which the licensee is charged involves fraud, misrepresentation or a false promise in which case the accusation shall be filed within one year after the date of discovery by the aggrieved party of the fraud, misrepresentation or false promise or within three years after the occurrence thereof, whichever is later, except that in no case shall an accusation be filed later than 10 years from the occurrence of the alleged grounds for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 546.)
-------------------------------------------

10103.

The lapsing or suspension of a license by operation of law or by order or decision of the department or a court of law, or the voluntary surrender of a license by a licensee shall not deprive the department of jurisdiction to proceed with any investigation of or action or disciplinary proceeding against such licensee, or to render a decision suspending or revoking such license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 651.)
-------------------------------------------

10106.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, in any order issued in resolution of a disciplinary proceeding before the department, the commissioner may request the administrative law judge to direct a licensee found to have committed a violation of this part to pay a sum not to exceed the reasonable costs of the investigation and enforcement of the case.

(b) In the case of a disciplined licensee that is a corporation or a partnership, the order may be made against the licensed corporate entity or licensed partnership.

(c) A certified copy of the actual costs, or a good faith estimate of costs where actual costs are not available, signed by the
 commissioner or the commissioner’s designated representative, shall be prima facie evidence of reasonable costs of investigation and prosecution of the case. The costs shall include the amount of investigative and enforcement costs up to the date of the hearing, including, but not limited to, charges imposed by the Attorney General.

(d) The administrative law judge shall make a proposed finding of the amount of reasonable costs of investigation and prosecution of the case when requested pursuant to subdivision (a). The finding of the administrative law judge with regard to costs shall not be reviewable by the commissioner to increase the cost award. The commissioner may reduce or eliminate the cost award, or remand to the administrative law judge where the proposed decision fails to make a finding on costs requested pursuant to subdivision (a).

(e) Where an order for recovery of
 costs is made and timely payment is not made as directed in the commissioner’s decision, the commissioner may enforce the order for repayment in any appropriate court. This right of enforcement shall be in addition to any other rights the commissioner may have as to any licentiate to pay costs.

(f) In any action for recovery of costs, proof of the commissioner’s decision shall be conclusive proof of the validity of the order of payment and the terms for payment.

(g) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the department shall not renew or reinstate the license of any licensee who has failed to pay all of the costs ordered under this section.

(2) The department may, in its discretion, conditionally renew or reinstate for a maximum of one year the license of any licensee who demonstrates
 financial hardship and who enters into a formal agreement with the department to reimburse the department within that one-year period for the unpaid costs.

(h) All costs recovered under this section shall be considered a reimbursement for costs incurred and shall be deposited in the Real Estate Fund to be available, notwithstanding Section 10451, upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(i) Nothing in this section shall preclude the department from including the recovery of the costs of investigation and enforcement of a case in any stipulated settlement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 6.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Real Estate Regulations [10130. - 10249.93.]



  ARTICLE 1. Scope of Regulation [10130. - 10149.]

10130.

It is unlawful for any person to engage in the business of, act in the capacity of, advertise as, or assume to act as a real estate broker or a real estate salesperson within this state without first obtaining a real estate license from the department, or to engage in the business of, act in the capacity of, advertise as, or assume to act as a mortgage loan originator within this state without having obtained a license endorsement.

The commissioner may prefer a complaint for violation of this section before any court of competent jurisdiction, and the commissioner and his or her counsel, deputies, or assistants may assist in presenting the law or facts at the trial.

It is the duty of
 the district attorney of each county in this state to prosecute all violations of this section in their respective counties in which the violations occur.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 569, Sec. 2.   (AB 1950)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10131.

A real estate broker within the meaning of this part is a person who, for a compensation or in expectation of a compensation, regardless of the form or time of payment, does or negotiates to do one or more of the following acts for another or others:

(a) Sells or offers to sell, buys or offers to buy, solicits prospective sellers or buyers of, solicits or obtains listings of, or negotiates the purchase, sale, or exchange of real property or a business opportunity.

(b) Leases or rents or offers to lease or rent, or places for rent, or solicits listings of places for rent, or solicits for prospective tenants, or negotiates the sale, purchase, or exchanges of leases on real property, or
 on a business opportunity, or collects rents from real property, or improvements thereon, or from business opportunities.

(c) Assists or offers to assist in filing an application for the purchase or lease of, or in locating or entering upon, lands owned by the state or federal government.

(d) Solicits borrowers or lenders for or negotiates loans or collects payments or performs services for borrowers or lenders or note owners in connection with loans secured directly or collaterally by liens on real property or on a business opportunity.

(e) Sells or offers to sell, buys or offers to buy, or exchanges or offers to exchange a real property sales contract, or a promissory note secured directly or collaterally by a lien on real property or on a business opportunity, and performs services for the holders
 thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 27.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10131.01.

(a) Subdivision (b) of Section 10131 does not apply to (1) the manager of a hotel, motel, auto and trailer park, to the resident manager of an apartment building, apartment complex, or court, or to the employees of that manager, or (2) any person or entity, including a person employed by a real estate broker, who, on behalf of another or others, solicits or arranges, or accepts reservations or money, or both, for transient occupancies described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1940 of the Civil Code, in a dwelling unit in a common interest development, as defined in Section 4100 of the Civil Code, in a dwelling unit in an apartment building or complex, or in a single-family home, or (3) any person other than the resident manager or employees of that manager,
 performing the following functions, who is the employee of the property management firm retained to manage a residential apartment building or complex or court and who is performing under the supervision and control of a broker of record who is an employee of that property management firm or a salesperson licensed to the broker who meets certain minimum requirements as specified in a regulation issued by the commissioner:

(A) Showing rental units and common areas to prospective tenants.

(B) Providing or accepting preprinted rental applications, or responding to inquiries from a prospective tenant concerning the completion of the application.

(C) Accepting deposits or fees for credit checks or administrative
 costs and accepting security deposits and rents.

(D) Providing information about rental rates and other terms and provisions of a lease or rental agreement, as set out in a schedule provided by an employer.

(E) Accepting signed leases and rental agreements from prospective tenants.

(b) A broker or salesperson shall exercise reasonable supervision and control over the activities of nonlicensed persons acting under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(c) A broker employing nonlicensed persons to act under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall comply with Section 10163 for each apartment building or complex or court where the nonlicensed persons are employed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 1.   (AB 806)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 86 of Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

10131.1.

(a) A real estate broker within the meaning of this part is also a person who engages as a principal in the business of making loans or buying from, selling to, or exchanging with the public, real property sales contracts or promissory notes secured directly or collaterally by liens on real property, or who makes agreements with the public for the collection of payments or for the performance of services in connection with real property sales contracts or promissory notes secured directly or collaterally by liens on real property.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “In the business” means any of the following:

(A) The acquisition for resale to the public, and not as an investment, of eight or more real property sales contracts or promissory notes secured directly or collaterally by liens on real property during a calendar year.

(B) The sale to or exchange with the public of eight or more real property sales contracts or promissory notes secured directly or collaterally by liens on real property during a calendar year. However, no transaction negotiated through a real estate licensee shall be considered in determining whether a person is a real estate broker within the meaning of this section.

(C) The making of eight or more loans in a calendar year from the person’s own funds to the public when those loans are held or resold and are secured directly or collaterally by a lien on residential real property consisting of a single dwelling unit in a condominium or cooperative or on any parcel containing only residential buildings if the total number of units on the parcel is four or less. However, no transaction negotiated through a real estate broker who meets the criteria of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 10232 shall be considered in determining whether a person is a real estate broker within the meaning of this section.

(2) “Sale,” “resale,” and “exchange” include every disposition of any interest in a real property sales contract or promissory note secured directly or collaterally by a lien on real property, except the original issuance of a promissory note by a borrower or a real property sales contract by a vendor, either of which is to be secured directly by a lien on real property owned by the borrower or vendor.

(3) “Own funds” means either of the following:

(A) Cash, corporate capital, or warehouse credit lines at commercial banks, savings banks, savings and loan associations, industrial loan companies, or other sources that are liability items on the person’s financial statements, whether secured or unsecured.

(B) Cash, corporate capital, or warehouse credit lines at commercial banks, savings banks, savings and loan associations, industrial loan companies, or other sources that are liability items on the financial statement of an affiliate of the person, whether secured or unsecured.

(4) “Own funds” does not include funds provided by a third party to fund a loan on condition that the third party will subsequently purchase or accept an assignment of the loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 301, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

10131.2.

A real estate broker within the meaning of this part is also a person who engages in the business of claiming, demanding, charging, receiving, collecting or contracting for the collection of an advance fee in connection with any employment undertaken to promote the sale or lease of real property or of a business opportunity by advance fee listing, advertisement or other offering to sell, lease, exchange or rent property or a business opportunity, or to obtain a loan or loans thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 172.)
-------------------------------------------

10131.3.

A real estate broker within the meaning of this part is also a person who, for another or others, for compensation or in expectation of compensation, issues or sells, solicits prospective sellers or purchasers of, solicits or obtains listings of, or negotiates the purchase, sale, or exchange of securities as specified in Section 25206 of the Corporations Code.

The provisions of this section do not apply to a broker-dealer or agent of a broker-dealer licensed by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation under the provisions of the Corporate Securities Law of 1968.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 8.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10131.4.

A real estate broker within the meaning of this part is also a person who acts for another or others for compensation or in expectation of compensation, to do one or more of the following acts:

(a) To sell or offer for sale, buy or offer to buy, solicit prospective sellers or purchasers, solicit or obtain listings, or negotiate the purchase, sale, or exchange of mineral, oil, or gas property.

(b) To solicit borrowers or lenders for or negotiate loans on mineral, oil, or gas property, or collect payments for lenders in connection with these loans.

(c) To lease or offer to lease or negotiate the sale, purchase, or exchange of leases on mineral, oil, or gas property.

(d) To rent or place for rent, mineral, oil, or gas property or to collect rent or royalties from mineral, oil, or gas property or improvements thereon.

(e) Other than as an officer or employee of the state or federal government, to assist or offer to assist another or others in filing an application for the purchase or lease of, or to locate or enter upon mineral, oil, or gas property owned by the state or federal government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 416, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10131.45.

A real estate broker within the meaning of this part is also a person who engages in the following businesses as a principal:

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 10133.35, buying or leasing, or taking an option on mineral, oil, or gas property for the purpose of sale, exchange, lease, sublease, or assignment of a lease of the property or any part of the property.

(b) Offering mining claims or any interest therein for sale or assignment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 416, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10131.5.

A nonresident of California may become a real estate broker by conforming to all of the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 455.)
-------------------------------------------

10131.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person licensed as a real estate broker may sell or offer to sell, buy or offer to buy, solicit prospective purchasers of, solicit or obtain listings of, or negotiate the purchase, sale, or exchange of any manufactured home or mobilehome only if the manufactured home or mobilehome has been registered under Part 2 (commencing with Section 18000) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) No real estate broker who engages in the activities authorized by this section shall maintain any place of business where two or more manufactured homes or mobilehomes are displayed and offered for sale by the person, unless the broker is also
 licensed as a mobilehome dealer as provided for by Part 2 (commencing with Section 18000) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) As used in this chapter, “manufactured home” means a structure as defined in Section 18007 of the Health and Safety Code, and “mobilehome” means a structure as defined in Section 18008 of the Health and Safety Code. “Manufactured home” and “Mobilehome” do not include a recreational vehicle, as defined in Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code, a commercial modular, as defined in Section 18001.8 of the Health and Safety Code, or factory-built housing, as defined in Section 19971 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) In order to carry out this section, the commissioner shall prescribe by regulation, after consultation with the Department of Housing and Community Development, methods and procedures to assure compliance with requirements of the
 Health and Safety Code pertaining to manufactured home and mobilehome registration, collection of sales and use taxes, and transaction documentation.

(e) Nothing in this section increases or decreases, or in any way preempts, consumer notice requirements of the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 and related regulations which are set forth in Sections 5414 and 5422 of Title 42 of the United States Code and Subparts E and I of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 610, Sec. 1.   (AB 2762)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10131.7.

It is unlawful for any real estate licensee acting under authority of Section 10131.6 to do any of the following:

(a) To advertise or offer for sale in any manner any manufactured home or mobilehome, unless it is either in place on a lot rented or leased for human habitation within an established mobilehome park as defined in Section 18214 of the Health and Safety Code and the advertising or offering for sale is not contrary to any terms of a contract between the seller of the manufactured home or mobilehome and the owner of the mobilehome park, or is otherwise located, pursuant to a local zoning ordinance or permit, on a lot where its presence has been authorized or its continued presence and that use
 would be authorized for a total and uninterrupted period of at least one year.

(b) To fail to withdraw any advertisement of a manufactured home or mobilehome for sale, lease, or exchange within 48 hours after the real estate licensee’s receipt of notice that the manufactured home or mobilehome is no longer available for sale, lease, or exchange.

(c) To advertise or represent a mobilehome as a new mobilehome or a manufactured home as a new manufactured home.

(d) To include as an added cost to the selling price of a mobilehome, an amount for licensing, as prescribed by Section 10751 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, except where the buyer and seller agree to the proration of the license fees for the applicable license period, or transfer of title of the mobilehome as a vehicle, which amount is not due to the state
 unless, prior to the sale, the amount has been paid by the licensee to the state in order to avoid penalties that would have accrued because of late payment of the fees.

(e) To make any representation that a manufactured home or mobilehome is capable of being transported on California highways if the manufactured home or mobilehome does not meet all of the equipment requirements applicable to manufactured homes or mobilehomes of Division 12 (commencing with Section 24000) of the Vehicle Code, or to fail to disclose any material fact respecting those equipment requirements.

(f) To advertise or otherwise represent, or knowingly to allow to be advertised or represented on the real estate licensee’s behalf or at the real estate licensee’s place of business, that no downpayment is required in connection with the sale of a manufactured home or mobilehome when downpayment is in fact